Nebraska, session 109, LB232.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB232 LB232
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, a life insurance
policy includes, but is not limited to, an individual life insurance
policy and a group life insurance policy.
(2) No policy of life insurance issued or delivered in this state
after the effective date of this act and subject to an assignment as
security for an indebtedness made in this state shall terminate or lapse
by reason of default in payment of any premium due on such policy unless
a notice of pending lapse and termination of such policy has been
provided at least thirty days prior to the effective date of such lapse
and termination by the insurer to any known assignee having an interest
in the life insurance policy.
(3) The insurer shall electronically provide notice of the pending
lapse and termination to any assignee which has requested notice pursuant
to subsection (4) of this section. The insurer shall be permitted to
charge the policy owner for the notice directly or as a charge against
the policy for the reasonable cost of complying with this subsection, but
in no event shall such charge exceed two dollars and fifty cents for each
notice.
(4) An assignee of a policy of life insurance under an assignment as
security for an indebtedness made in this state may request that the
insurer provide such assignee a notice of default in payment of any
premium due on such policy at least thirty days prior to the effective
date of any lapse and termination of such life insurance policy. The
request shall be made before default in payment of premium due on such
policy, shall be in writing, delivered to the insurer either by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or electronically, and shall be effective
not later than ten business days after the date of receipt by the
insurer. Such request shall also specify the name and address at which
the notice shall be provided electronically by the insurer to the
assignee, specify the name of the insured, and specify the policy number.
Upon termination of the assignee's rights under the assignment, the
-2-

LB232 LB232
2025 2025
assignee shall promptly mail a release of the assignment to the insurer.
(5) This section shall not apply to nonrenewal and shall not be
construed to affect the contractual rights of assignees.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section, senior-citizen insured
shall mean a Nebraska resident who is the policy owner or the insured and
is sixty-five years of age or older.
(2) Every insurer that has in force a premium-paying individual life
insurance policy, issued or delivered in this state on or after the
effective date of this act, on the life of a senior-citizen insured shall
permit the senior-citizen insured to designate one third-party individual
to whom the insurer shall transmit any notice of cancellation,
nonrenewal, and conditional renewal. The senior-citizen insured shall
notify the insurer that a third-party has been so designated. Such
notification shall be in writing, shall be delivered to the insurer
either by certified mail, return receipt requested, or electronically,
and shall be effective not later than ten business days after the date of
receipt by the insurer. The notification shall contain, in writing, an
acceptance by the third-party designee to receive any notice of
cancellation, nonrenewal, and conditional renewal from the insurer and
shall contain the name and address at which such notices shall be
provided electronically by the insurer to the third-party designee.
(3)(a) If the third-party designee desires to terminate the
designee's status as third-party designee, such designee shall provide
written notice to both the insurer and the senior-citizen insured.
(b) If the senior-citizen insured desires to terminate the third-
party designation, the insured shall provide written notice to the
insurer.
(c) The transmission to the third-party designee of any notice of
cancellation, nonrenewal, or conditional renewal shall be in addition to
a copy of such document transmitted to the senior-citizen insured.
(4) Designation as a third-party designee for a senior-citizen
-3-

LB232 LB232
2025 2025
insured shall not constitute acceptance of any liability by the third-
party designee for services provided to such senior-citizen insured. The
insurer shall notify a senior-citizen insured annually in writing of the
availability of the third-party designee notice procedure and provide
information on how the insured can commence this procedure, except that
such notice need not be provided once a senior citizen has made a
designation of a third-party designee.
-4-